Utah statutes.
53A-6-111.   Teacher classifications.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Associate teacher" means a person who does not currently hold a level 1, 2, or 3 license, but is permitted to teach in a public school under another authorization.

(b)  "Teacher" means a person who currently holds a level 1, 2, or 3 license.

(2)  Each school district and school shall identify and distinguish between teachers and associate teachers, including using the appropriate title in all communication with parents, guardians, and members of the public.

(3)  Lists of teachers and associate teachers shall be maintained at each school and shall be available for review by any person upon request.



Enacted by Chapter 46, 2004 General Session

